Utah statutes.
17B-1-203.   Process to initiate the creation of a local district --
Petition or resolution.
(1)  The process to create a local district may be initiated by:
(a)  subject to Section 17B-1-204, a petition signed by the owners of private
real property that:
(i)  is located within the proposed local district;
(ii)  covers at least 33% of the total private land area within the proposed
local district as a whole and within each applicable area;
(iii)  is equal in value to at least 25% of the value of all private real
property within the proposed local district as a whole and within each
applicable area; and
(iv)  complies with the requirements of Subsection 17B-1-205(1) and Section
17B-1-208;
(b)  subject to Section 17B-1-204, a petition that:
(i)  is signed by registered voters residing within the proposed local
district as a whole and within each applicable area, equal in number to at
least 33% of the number of votes cast in the proposed local district as a
whole and in each applicable area, respectively, for the office of governor at
the last regular general election prior to the filing of the petition; and
(ii)  complies with the requirements of Subsection 17B-1-205(1) and Section
17B-1-208;
(c)  a resolution proposing the creation of a local district, adopted by the
legislative body of each county whose unincorporated area includes and each
municipality whose boundaries include any of the proposed local district; or
(d)  a resolution proposing the creation of a local district, adopted by the
board of trustees of an existing local district whose boundaries completely
encompass the proposed local district, if:
(i)  the proposed local district is being created to provide one or more
components of the same service that the initiating local district is
authorized to provide; and
(ii)  the initiating local district is not providing to the area of the
proposed local district any of the components that the proposed local district
is being created to provide.
(2) (a)  Each resolution under Subsection (1)(c) or (d) shall:
(i)  describe the area proposed to be included in the proposed local district;
(ii)  be accompanied by a map that shows the boundaries of the proposed local
district;
(iii)  describe the service proposed to be provided by the proposed local
district;
(iv)  if the resolution proposes the creation of a specialized local district,
specify the type of specialized local district proposed to be created;
(v)  explain the anticipated method of paying the costs of providing the
proposed service;
(vi)  state the estimated average financial impact on a household within the
proposed local district;
(vii)  state the number of members that the board of trustees of the proposed
local district will have, consistent with the requirements of Subsection
17B-1-302(2);
(viii)  for a proposed basic local district:
(A)  state whether the members of the board of trustees will be elected or
appointed or whether some members will be elected and some appointed, as
provided in Section 17B-1-1402;
(B)  if one or more members will be elected, state the basis upon which each
elected member will be elected; and
(C)  if applicable, explain how the election or appointment of board members
will transition from one method to another based on stated milestones or
events, as provided in Section 17B-1-1402;
(ix)  for a proposed improvement district whose remaining area members or
county members, as those terms are defined in Section 17B-2a-404, are to be
elected, state that those members will be elected; and
(x)  for a proposed service area that is entirely within the unincorporated
area of a single county, state whether the initial board of trustees will be:
(A)  the county legislative body;
(B)  appointed as provided in Section 17B-1-304; or
(C)  elected as provided in Section 17B-1-306.
(b)  Each county or municipal legislative body adopting a resolution under
Subsection (1)(c) shall, on or before the first public hearing under Section
17B-1-210, mail or deliver a copy of the resolution to the responsible body if
the county or municipal legislative body's resolution is one of multiple
resolutions adopted by multiple county or municipal legislative bodies
proposing the creation of the same local district.
(3)  Each petition under Subsection (1)(a) or (b) to create a local district
to acquire a groundwater right under Subsection 17B-1-103(2)(a) or (b) shall
explain the anticipated method of paying for the groundwater right
acquisition.
